GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-foreignames.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     first names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	14-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# [E] http://publications.europa.eu/code/it/it-5000500.htm
!# [W] Wikipedia
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

 +Prop +Adj +NAdj


+Firstname



+Sg +Pl
+Masc +Fem

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space


!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;

LEXICON MFSG	MSG; FSG;

LEXICON ROOT 
Abdellatif+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Acarie+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Adalbert+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Addée+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Adélicia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Adélorina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Adgive+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Adolfo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Adolinia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Adorildée+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Advélinia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Agafon+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Aglaïa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Aigline+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Akhun+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Alaeddine+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Alan+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Albaïse+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Albertina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alcilie+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Aldénise+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Aldoïsia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alédina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alessandro+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Alexilianne+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Algérine+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ali+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Alisette+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Almandine+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alméreine+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Almondine+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alonzo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Alouysia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alphélise+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alphonda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alrick+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Alucia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alvildée+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alzérinie+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Amadie+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Amarante+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ambrosine+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Amélodie+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Amiliana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Amira+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Analda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Anarguirios+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Anatholie+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Andréenne+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Andrian+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Anélisa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Anfisa+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Angélina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Anikó+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Anne-Marie+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Anorianne+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Antar+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Antélinia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Antonio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Anucha+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Apolinaria+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Arbina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ardalion+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Ardélène+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Arganise+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Aristide+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Arjana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Armélaine+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Armicia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Arnelle+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Arnost+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Arsilie+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Arthélienne+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Arturo+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Arvilla+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Astéria+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Atan+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Auberte+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Auglorine+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
August+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Aurélienne+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Austilia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Avelina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Avigdor+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Aysen+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Azarienne+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Azura+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Badira+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Baldvin+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Barish+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Béchir+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Bengisu+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Bernardo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Billy+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Blerim+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Bretislav+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Brigitha+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Brynja+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Candid+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Cenek+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Chadia+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Christie+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Çınar+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Clovis+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Corélia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Cyrano+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Dahou+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Damis+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Denes+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Dervis+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Diodore+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Donatien+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Doreen+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Dragomira+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Édouard+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ekiel+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Elie+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Emi+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Emmerich+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Emmi+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Erin+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ettore+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ewan+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Fabiola+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Fazilet+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Fehmi+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Fethia+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Florencio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Fülöp+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Fulya+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Fumiyo+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Gerda+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Gestur+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Gísli+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Gretchen+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Grover+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Gunnsteinn+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Hafida+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Hallmar+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Hayati+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Hedvika+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Henri-Georges+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Himmet+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Hürriyet+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Ievdokim+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Iklil+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Intisar+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Istvan+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ivano+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Javad+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Jean-Alain+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jean-Augustin+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jean-Chiquito+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jean-Elias+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jean-Frans+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jean-Harold+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jean-James+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jean-Ken+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jean-Marlon+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jeannine+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Jean-Oliver+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jean-Raymond+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jean-Sergueï+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jean-Valentin+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jindrich+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jonathan+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Jósteinn+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Kaissa+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Katariina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Kay+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Khiyati+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Kıvanç+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Kjartan+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Kostya+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Lambert+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Lancelote+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Leïla+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Leó+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Lesly+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Lorena+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Ludwig+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Lydiane+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Maâkha+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Mahadevan+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Marcelino+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Marie-Bénédicte+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Marie-Georgina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Marie-Luce+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Marie+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Mark+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Marushka+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Masashi+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Mathurin+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Megumi+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Michal+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Micha+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Miryam+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Mstislav+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Muhammet+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Nadiéjda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Nadjiba+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Natasha+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Nicolao+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Nicolas+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Norihide+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Olusegun+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Onufry+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Palmira+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Pancrace+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Paoline+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Phil+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Pierre+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Rafaïl+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Raffaele+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ragnhildur+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Rei+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Riad+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Rochdi+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Ronit+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Rowena+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ryuichi+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Saint-Aldo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Saint-Bashir+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Saint-Clark+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Sainte-Chantal+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Sainte-Indira+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Sainte-Marie-Josèphe+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Saint-Émile+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Sainte-Sapho+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Saint-Fritz+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Saint-Harvey+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Saint-Jean+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Saint-Lambert+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Saint-Maxence+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Saint-Patrice+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Saint-Robert+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Saint-Stan+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Saint-Warren+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Samantha+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Scot+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Sébastien+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Serafim+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Shana+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Shlum+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Simuna+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Siya+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Slobodan+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Suki+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Taji+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Tayyar+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Ted+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Thorbjörg+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Tino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Tirzah+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Tomoyuki+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Tsunemori+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Uluç+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Vagn+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Varlaam+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Vilppu+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Viorn+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Waylon+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Whoopi+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Wolfgang+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Yalçin+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Yoshe+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Zacharias+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
Zbynek+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Zoë+Prop+Firstname		MFSG;
